Utah statutes.
32B-4-422.   Unlawful dispensing.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Primary spirituous liquor" means the main distilled spirit in a beverage.

(b)  "Primary spirituous liquor" does not include a secondary alcoholic product used as a flavoring in conjunction with the primary distilled spirit in a beverage.

(2)  A retail licensee licensed under this title to sell, offer for sale, or furnish spirituous liquor for consumption on the licensed premises, or staff of the retail licensee may not:

(a)  sell, offer for sale, or furnish a primary spirituous liquor to a person on the licensed premises except in a quantity that does not exceed 1.5 ounces per beverage dispensed through a calibrated metered dispensing system approved by the department;

(b)  sell, offer for sale, or furnish more than a total of 2.5 ounces of spirituous liquor per beverage;

(c)  allow a person on the licensed premises to have more than a total of 2.5 ounces of spirituous liquor at a time; or

(d) (i)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(d)(ii), allow a person to have more than two spirituous liquor beverages at a time; or

(ii)  allow a person on the premises of the following to have more than one spirituous liquor beverage at a time:

(A)  a full-service restaurant licensee;

(B)  a person operating under a full-service restaurant sublicense;

(C)  an on-premise banquet licensee;

(D)  a person operating under an on-premise banquet sublicense; or

(E)  a single event permittee.

(3)  A violation of this section is a class C misdemeanor.

